Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2003
Biodegradable, defined.

Biodegradable shall mean degradable through a process by which fungi or bacteria secrete enzymes to convert a complex molecular structure to simple gases and organic compounds.

Laws 1989, LB 325, § 3.